Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2976.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-73-2.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-73 entitled "Child
Advocate Office" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-73-2.3. Child fatality reviews.
(a) The department of children, youth and families shall notify the office of the child
advocate verbally and electronically within forty-eight (48) hours of a confirmed fatality or near
fatality of a child who is the subject of a DCYF case and shall provide the office of the child
advocate with access to any written material about the case.
(b) The child advocate, working with a voluntary and confidential child fatality review
panel, whose members may vary on a case-by-case basis, shall review the case records of all
notifications in accordance with subsection (a) of fatalities and near fatalities of children under
twenty-one (21) years of age, if:
(1) The fatality or near fatality occurs while in the custody of, or involved with, the
department, or if the child’s family previously received services from the department;
(2) The fatality or near fatality is alleged to be from abuse or neglect of the child and the
child or child’s family had prior contact with the department; or
(3) A sibling, household member, or daycare provider has been the subject of a child abuse
and neglect investigation within the previous twelve (12) months, including, without limitation,
cases in which the report was unsubstantiated or the investigation is currently pending.
(c) The child fatality review panel shall assess and analyze such cases; make

recommendations regarding such cases; and make recommendations for improvements to laws,
policies, and practices that support the safety of children. Each report shall be made public within
thirty (30) days of its completion.
(d) The members of the child fatality review panel, established in accordance with this
section, shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions of § 42-73-10.
(e) The child advocate shall publicly announce the convening of a child fatality review
panel, including the age of the child involved.
(f) Any state agency cited in the report shall submit a written response within one hundred
eighty (180) days to the child advocate, the speaker of the house, president of the senate and
governor detailing the respective agency’s specific response to recommendations made pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section. The written response shall include:
(1) The recommendations the agency is capable of implementing, within its existing
authority and resources;
(2) The recommendations the agency will not implement with a corresponding reason why
implementation will not occur; and
(3) An implementation plan for necessary program planning and practice changes needed
in order to address implementation of recommendations.
(g) Reports required pursuant to this section shall be completed within six (6) months of
the date of any measure implemented by agencies cited in response to recommendations pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005351
========
LC005351 - Page 2 of 3